Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB933.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(e) of the act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Improper classification of employees.* * *(c.1) Investigations.--If the secretary receives information indicating that a person has violated this act, the secretary may investigate the matter. The secretary may:(1) investigate and ascertain wages paid to an employee;1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) enter and inspect a worksite or place of business at any reasonable time to examine and inspect records and conditions of employment that are necessary and appropriate to the enforcement of this act;(3) copy or compel the production of records, contracts and other documents that are necessary and appropriate to the enforcement of this act; and(4) require statements from the employer or individuals present at a worksite, in person or in writing.* * *(e) Acting in concert with other parties.--[A party that does not meet the definition of "employer" in section 2, but which intentionally contracts with an employer knowing the employer intends to misclassify employees in violation of this act, shall be subject to the same penalties, remedies or other actions as the employer found to be in violation of this act.] A general contractor or any other party that does not meet the definition of "employer" in section 2 and that contracts with an employer who misclassifies employees in violation of this act may be subject to the same penalties, remedies or other actions as the employer found to be in violation of this act.* * *Section 2. Sections 6, 7, 9(b) and 12 of the act are amended to read:Section 6. Administrative penalties.(a) General rule.--When the secretary finds that a person has violated this act, the secretary may assess and collect civil penalties of not more than [$1,000] $2,500 for the first violation, and not more than [$2,500] $5,000 for each subsequent violation.20250HB0933PN0999 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Factors to be considered.--When determining the amount of the penalty to be imposed, the secretary shall consider factors including, but not limited to:(1) The history of previous violations by the employer.(2) The seriousness of the violation.(3) The good faith of the employer.(4) The size of the employer's business.(c) Debarment.--In the event that the secretary determines, after notice and hearing as required under this act, that a person has intentionally violated this act, the secretary shall notify all public bodies of the names of those persons. No public body may award a contract to the person or to a business, corporation or partnership in which the person has an interest until three years have elapsed from the date of the notice to the public bodies.Section 7. Stop-work orders.(a) Issuance of order.--[(1) If the secretary determines, subsequent to the issuance of an order to show cause under section 4(c), that an employer, or officer or agent of the employer, has intentionally failed to properly classify an individual as an employee under section 4(a), the secretary may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to issue a stop-work order requiring the cessation of work by individuals who are improperly classified within 24 hours of the effective date of the order, or in the event that a majority of individuals working at a site are improperly classified, requiring the cessation of all business operations of that employer at each site at which a violation occurred within 24 hours of the effective date of the order.20250HB0933PN0999 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The order shall take effect when served upon the employer, or for a particular employer worksite, when served at the worksite. The order shall remain in effect until the court issues an order releasing the stop-work order or upon finding that the employer, or officer or agent of the employer, is no longer in violation of this act.(3) An order releasing a stop-work order may include a requirement that the employer file with the department periodic reports for a probationary period that shall not exceed two years demonstrating the employer's continued compliance with this act.(b) Applicability of orders and penalties.--Stop-work orders under subsection (a) and penalties under subsection (c) shall be in effect against any successor corporation or business entity that has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer against whom the stop-work order was issued or penalties imposed and which is engaged in the same or equivalent trade or activity.] If the department determines that an employer, or officer or agent of the employer, has intentionally failed to properly classify an individual as an employee under section 4(a), the department may issue an order requiring the cessation of construction. The following applies to the stop-work order:(1) The order may require satisfaction of conditions necessary to ensure that the employer complies with this act.(2) The order shall take effect when served upon the employer by first class mail or posting at the employer's worksite.(3) The order shall remain in effect until released by the department or a court of competent jurisdiction.20250HB0933PN0999 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The order shall be effective against a successor entity that:(i) has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer against whom the order was issued; and(ii) is engaged in construction. (5) An order releasing a stop-work order may include a requirement that the employer file with the department periodic reports for a probationary period that may not exceed two years demonstrating the employer's continued compliance with this act.(c) Penalty.--The court shall assess a penalty of [$1,000] $2,500 per day against an employer for each day that the employer conducts business operations that are in violation of a stop-work order issued under this section.Section 9. Certain agreement prohibited.* * *(b) Penalty.--A violation of subsection (a) shall be punishable by an administrative fine of not less than [$1,000] $2,500 and not more than [$2,500] $5,000. Each violation shall be considered a separate offense under this section.Section 12. Use of penalty funds.Any sum collected as a penalty under:(1) Sections 6, 7 and 9 for a violation of section 4(a)(1) shall be [paid into] divided equally between the Workers' Compensation Administration Fund and the department for costs related to enforcement.(2) Sections 6, 7 and 9 for a violation of section 4(a)(2) shall be [paid into] divided equally between the Special Administration Fund created under section 601.1 of the 20250HB0933PN0999 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Unemployment Compensation Law and the department for costs related to enforcement.(3) Section 9 for a violation of any other provision of this act shall be divided equally between the Workers' Compensation Administration Fund [and], the Special Administration Fund and the department for costs related to enforcement.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0933PN0999 - 6 - 12345678